src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Verb inflection
!  ---------------
!! The Wangkajunga language verbs inflect in persons.

LEXICON directional_prefixes
Directional/away+:%>maa Verb_stems ;
Directional/around+:%>parra parra_reduplication ;

! no compound stems as of yet - following lines commented out
! compound_verb_preverbs ;
! Directional/away+:%>maa compound_verb_preverbs ;
! Directional/around+:%>parra compound_verb_preverbs ;
Directional/around+:%>parra parra_reduplication ;

LEXICON parra_reduplication
Redpl+:%>parra  Verb_stems ;
 Verb_stems ;
! Redpl+:%>parra  compound_verb_preverbs ;


!! lexicon Verb_prefixes (above) -> lexicon Verb_stems (separate file) -> following lexicons, depending on
!! relevant conjugation:

! The Ø set
!LEXICON Ø_conjugation
!+V: Ø_conjugation_flags ;

LEXICON Ø_conjugation_iv 
+V+IV: Ø_conjugation_flags ;

LEXICON Ø_conjugation_tv
+V+TV: Ø_conjugation_flags ;

LEXICON Ø_conjugation_flags
@U.CONJ.Ø@ simple_verbs ;

! The WA set
!LEXICON WA_conjugation
!+V: WA_conjugation_flags ;

LEXICON WA_conjugation_iv
+V+IV: WA_conjugation_flags ;

LEXICON WA_conjugation_tv
+V+TV: WA_conjugation_flags ;

LEXICON WA_conjugation_flags
@U.CONJ.WA@ simple_verbs ;

! The RRA set
!LEXICON RAA_conjugation
!+V: RAA_conjugation_flags ;

LEXICON RRA_conjugation_iv 
+V+IV: RAA_conjugation_flags ;

LEXICON RRA_conjugation_tv
+V+TV: RAA_conjugation_flags ;

LEXICON RAA_conjugation_flags
@U.CONJ.RRA@ simple_verbs ;

! The LA set
!LEXICON LA_conjugation
!+V: LA_conjugation_flags ;

LEXICON LA_conjugation_iv
+V+IV: LA_conjugation_flags ;

LEXICON LA_conjugation_tv
+V+TV: LA_conjugation_flags ;

LEXICON LA_conjugation_flags
@U.CONJ.LA@ simple_verbs ;


!! is positioning of +V here okay? or better with separate lexicon / before prefixes?
LEXICON simple_verbs
 simple_verb_reduplication ;
 verb_derivational_suffix ;
 
LEXICON simple_verb_reduplication
 # ; ! remove when Redpl is working
! +Redpl:%>__ verb_derivational_suffix;

! no compound verbs stems added so next 3 lexicons will not be reached / used. No compound verbs found in W. texts.
LEXICON compound_verb_preverbs
+V: preverb_reduplication ;
+V: compound_verb_compounds ;

LEXICON preverb_reduplication
+Redpl:%>__ compound_verb_compounds ;

LEXICON compound_verb_compounds 
! another option is to have compound (preverb + compound) in verb stems (won't account for extra preverb
! reduplication)
@U.CONJ.RRA@+Compound/put:%>@U.CONJ.RRA@ju 		verb_derivational_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.WA@+Compound/hit:%>@U.CONJ.WA@pu 		verb_derivational_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.LA@+Compound/have:%>@U.CONJ.LA@kanyi		verb_derivational_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.Ø@+Compound/carry:%>@U.CONJ.Ø@kati 		verb_derivational_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.RRA@+Compound/go:%>@U.CONJ.RRA@ya 		verb_derivational_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.Ø@+Compound/lie:%>@U.CONJ.Ø@ngarri 		verb_derivational_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.LA@+Compound/get_up:%>@U.CONJ.LA@paka 		verb_derivational_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.RRA@+Compound/mouth_action:%>@U.CONJ.RRA@ja 	verb_derivational_suffix ;


LEXICON verb_derivational_suffix
  verb_tense_inflections;
@P.CONJ.WA@+Act:@P.CONJ.WA@%>ti verb_tense_inflections ;
@U.CONJ.LA@+Caus/Make:@U.CONJ.LA@%>ma verb_tense_inflections ;
@U.CONJ.LA@+Caus/PutTo:@U.CONJ.LA@%>ju verb_tense_inflections ; ! -ju may have a mixed conjugation

LEXICON verb_tense_inflections
! nominaliser form going to temp_rel
@U.CONJ.Ø@+Nomz:%>@U.CONJ.Ø@nja   temporal_relative ;
@U.CONJ.WA@+Nomz:%>@U.CONJ.WA@ngkunja  temporal_relative ;
@U.CONJ.RRA@+Nomz:%>@U.CONJ.RRA@nkunja  temporal_relative ;
@U.CONJ.LA@+Nomz:%>@U.CONJ.LA@nja  temporal_relative ;
! nominaliser form going to noun stem
@U.CONJ.Ø@+Nomz:%>@U.CONJ.Ø@nja   n_agr ; ! TODO: remove +V? +N will be added in n_agr
@U.CONJ.WA@+Nomz:%>@U.CONJ.WA@ngkunja  n_agr ; ! TODO: remove flag diacritics as no longer verbs?
@U.CONJ.RRA@+Nomz:%>@U.CONJ.RRA@nkunja  n_agr ;
@U.CONJ.LA@+Nomz:%>@U.CONJ.LA@nja  n_agr ;
! serial forms TODO: replace # with PA
@U.CONJ.Ø@+Ser:%>@U.CONJ.Ø@ra  person_number_case_1 ;
@U.CONJ.WA@+Ser:%>@U.CONJ.WA@ngkula person_number_case_1 ;
@U.CONJ.RRA@+Ser:%>@U.CONJ.RRA@nkula person_number_case_1 ;
@U.CONJ.LA@+Ser:%>@U.CONJ.LA@ra  person_number_case_1 ;
! present tense. TODO: return to this.
@U.CONJ.Ø@+Prs:@U.CONJ.Ø@%>in  directional_suffix ; ! additional vowel-deletion in twolc.
@U.CONJ.WA@+Prs:@U.CONJ.WA@%>ngin directional_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.RRA@+Prs:@U.CONJ.RRA@%>nin directional_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.LA@+Prs:@U.CONJ.LA@%>nin  directional_suffix ;
! perfective tense endings (imperative, past narrative, past, future)
@U.CONJ.Ø@+Perf+Imprt:@U.CONJ.Ø%>  directional_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.WA@+Perf+Imprt:@U.CONJ.WA@%>wa  directional_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.RRA@+Perf+Imprt:@U.CONJ.RRA@%>rra directional_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.LA@+Perf+Imprt:@U.CONJ.LA@%>la  directional_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.Ø@+Perf+PstNar:@U.CONJ.Ø%>  directional_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.WA@+Perf+PstNar:@U.CONJ.WA@%>wa  directional_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.RRA@+Perf+PstNar:@U.CONJ.RRA@%>rra directional_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.LA@+Perf+PstNar:@U.CONJ.LA@%>la  directional_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.Ø@+Perf+Pst:@U.CONJ.Ø@%>ngu  directional_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.Ø@+Perf+Pst:@U.CONJ.Ø@%>ngun  directional_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.WA@+Perf+Pst:@U.CONJ.WA@%>ngu  directional_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.WA@+Perf+Pst:@U.CONJ.WA@%>ngun  directional_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.RRA@+Perf+Pst:@U.CONJ.RRA@%>nu  directional_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.RRA@+Perf+Pst:@U.CONJ.RRA@%>nun  directional_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.LA@+Perf+Pst:@U.CONJ.LA@%>rnu  directional_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.LA@+Perf+Pst:@U.CONJ.LA@%>rnun  directional_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.Ø@+Perf+Fut:@U.CONJ.Ø@%>ku  directional_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.WA@+Perf+Fut:@U.CONJ.WA@%>ngku  directional_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.RRA@+Perf+Fut:@U.CONJ.RRA@%>nku  directional_suffix ;
@U.CONJ.LA@+Perf+Fut:@U.CONJ.LA@%>lku  directional_suffix ;
! imperfective forms (expanded in separate lexicon)
@U.CONJ.Ø@+Imperf:@U.CONJ.Ø@%>  imperfective_inflections ;
@U.CONJ.WA@+Imperf:@U.CONJ.WA@%>nga imperfective_inflections ;
@U.CONJ.RRA@+Imperf:@U.CONJ.RRA@%>na imperfective_inflections ;
@U.CONJ.LA@+Imperf:@U.CONJ.LA@%>n imperfective_inflections ;
! irrealis forms (expanded in separate lexicon)
@U.CONJ.Ø@+Irr:@U.CONJ.Ø@%>  irrealis_inflections ;
@U.CONJ.WA@+Irr:@U.CONJ.WA@%>ngku irrealis_inflections ;
@U.CONJ.RRA@+Irr:@U.CONJ.RRA@%>nku irrealis_inflections ;
@U.CONJ.LA@+Irr:@U.CONJ.LA@%>l  irrealis_inflections ; 

LEXICON temporal_relative
+Trel:%>janu # ;
+Trel:%>nu # ;

LEXICON imperfective_inflections
+Pst:%>ma directional_suffix ;
+PstHbt:%>ma directional_suffix ;
+Fut:%>mal directional_suffix ;
+Imprt:%>ma directional_suffix ;

LEXICON irrealis_inflections
+Admon:%>jaku  Avoid ; ! it can also go to the same lexicon as for noun avoid case..
+Avoid:%>ngkamarra # ; ! jaku ADMON not required for avoid
! Avoid ; ! this will have the same result as the line above.
+Admon:%>jaku  directional_suffix ;
+Oblig:%>ngara  directional_suffix ;
+Hyp:%>mara  directional_suffix ;
+Char:%>payi  directional_suffix ;
+Int:%>kija  Intentional ;
+Unr:%>ra  Unrealistic;

LEXICON Avoid ! there is also an avoid nominal suffix
+Avoid:%>ngkamarra # ;

LEXICON Unrealistic
   directional_suffix ;
+Purp:%>ku  directional_suffix ;
+Contr:%>munu  directional_suffix ;
+Int:%>kija  Intentional;

LEXICON Intentional
 # ;
+Erg:%>lu # ;

LEXICON directional_suffix
 post_inflection_endings ;
+Directional/towards:%>ni  post_inflection_endings ;

LEXICON post_inflection_endings
 K_1 ; ! PA ;
+Grp:%>nirra  K_1 ; ! PA ;
+Compl:%>ka  K_1 ; ! PA ;
+Warn:%>rta  K_1 ; ! PA ;







! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
