src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
!! Verbs
!  -----
!! Verbs in the Wangkajunga language are actions.

LEXICON Verb_stems
! simple verbs

! Ø conjugation
nyina Ø_conjugation_iv "to sit" ;
ngara Ø_conjugation_iv "to stand" ;
ngarri Ø_conjugation_iv "to lie" ;
jarrpa Ø_conjugation_tv "to enter" ; ! if 2nd arg is not Dat
kanyin Ø_conjugation_tv "to have" ;
ngarri Ø_conjugation_iv "to lie (down), sleep" ;
kati Ø_conjugation_tv "to take, carry" ;
ngalkun Ø_conjugation_tv "to eat" ; ! intransitive also possible
ngurrin Ø_conjugation_tv "to search" ;

! WA conjugation
pu WA_conjugation_tv "to hit" ;
ka WA_conjugation_tv "to carry" ;
palipu WA_conjugation_tv "to find" ;
kulyarti WA_conjugation_tv "to track" ;
nyaku WA_conjugation_tv "to look, see" ; ! could also be RRA conj?
nya WA_conjugation_tv "to see" ;
purlturrpu WA_conjugation_tv "to skewer" ; ! actually compound verb purlturr + pu
wirrupu WA_conjugation_tv "to throw away" ; ! actually compound verb wirru + pu
yu WA_conjugation_tv "to give" ;
kaarlpu WA_conjugation_tv "to break" ; ! compound kaarl + pu

! RRA conjugation
ya RRA_conjugation_iv "to go" ;
ngartalya RRA_conjugation_tv "to break, crack" ; ! compound ngartal + ya
ma RRA_conjugation_tv "to get" ;
ju RRA_conjugation_iv "to put" ; ! if 2nd arg is Dat
wanin RRA_conjugation_tv "to cut, grade (a road)" ; ! could be any conj? only PstHbt and PerfPst in texts.
pali RRA_conjugation_tv "to flatten" ;
watiju RRA_conjugation_tv "to track" ; ! instances of -nu and -rnu past forms.
tirrirtika RRA_conjugation_iv "to descend, climb down" ; ! similar form tirrirti
takurlju RRA_conjugation_tv "to put into" ; ! compound takurl + ju
takurltakurlju RRA_conjugation_tv "to put into" ; ! compound with redpl takurl+Redpl+ju

! LA conjugation
paja LA_conjugation_tv "to bite" ;
kunta LA_conjugation_tv "to cut" ;
manji LA_conjugation_tv "to collect" ;
jawa LA_conjugation_iv "to dig, dig a hole, bury" ;
tikarlpaka LA_conjugation_iv "to climb up" ;
yatu LA_conjugation_iv "to scrape out, cut" ;
wana LA_conjugation_tv "to follow, chase" ;
waja LA_conjugation_tv "to spear" ;
paka LA_conjugation_iv "to get up" ;
waka LA_conjugation_tv "to spear" ;
pawu LA_conjugation_tv "to cook" ;
jiki LA_conjugation_iv "to drink" ;
ngalanga LA_conjugation_tv "to eat" ;
ngala LA_conjugation_tv "to eat" ; ! irregular?
tili LA_conjugation_tv "to set alight" ;
yirna LA_conjugation_tv "to collect" ; ! normally the nominal stem "man"
ngarangura LA_conjugation_iv "to take a break, rest" ; 
kaarla LA_conjugation_tv "to break" ;
yankirra LA_conjugation_tv "to crack" ;
yarra LA_conjugation_tv "to untie" ;
ngarra LA_conjugation_tv "to fix" ;
karrpi LA_conjugation_tv "to tie up" ;
yirrpi LA_conjugation_iv "to come, enter" ;

! preverbs (as part of complex verbs)

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
 
